Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Cooperative Livestock Protective Associations

272.360.
Legislative policy as to cooperative livestock protective associations.

In order to promote, foster, and encourage the raising of livestock in the state and for the further purpose of permitting livestock producers to organize under the laws of Kentucky and form cooperative livestock corporations whereby the members thereof may associate themselves together for protection under the laws of the state and through such association provide a suitable means to the members and for reimbursing said members for losses of livestock due to depredation, disease and death caused by attacks from dogs and other causes, KRS

272.360

to

272.510

are enacted.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 1.

272.370.
Who may organize.

Any twenty (20) or more farmers who are residents of one (1) or not more than five (5) counties of this state, whether they own the land they farm or not, may form a nonprofit livestock protective corporation without capital stock under the provisions of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 3.

272.380.
Purpose of associations.

An association may be organized in any section of the state for the purpose of affording protection to the farmers in that locality in the raising of livestock on their farms.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 4.

272.390.
Articles of incorporation — What to set forth.

Each association formed under KRS

272.360

to

272.510

must prepare and file articles of incorporation, setting forth:

The name of the association that satisfies KRS

14A.3-010

;

The place where its principal business will be transacted;

The term for which it is to exist; the number of directors thereof which must not be less than five (5) and may be any number in excess thereof; the term of office of such directors; and the names and addresses of those who are to serve as incorporating directors for the first term, or until election and qualification of their successors; and

The property rights of the members and whether the interest of each member will be equal or unequal; and if unequal, the rule or rules applicable to all members by which the property rights and interests, respectively, of each member shall be determined and fixed; and provision for the admission of new members who shall be entitled to share in the property of the association with the old members, in accordance with such general rule or rules.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, §
5; 2007, ch. 137, §
78, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
78, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact., and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, §
59, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

(6/26/2007). The numbering of subsections in this section has been altered by the Reviser of Statutes from the numbering in 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 78, under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

272.400.
Amendments to articles.

The articles of incorporation may be altered or amended at any regular or special meeting called for that purpose. An amendment must first be approved by two-thirds (2/3) of the directors and then adopted by a vote representing a majority of all the members of the association. Amendments, when so adopted, shall be recorded in accordance with the provisions of the general corporation law of this state, except that the fee to be charged by the Secretary of State for filing such an amendment shall be one dollar ($1).

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 6; 1946, ch. 141, § 27.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Filing of amendments to articles of ordinary private corporation, KRS

271B.10-060

.

272.410.
Subscription and filing of articles — Fees.

The articles of incorporation shall be signed, acknowledged, filed and recorded in accordance with the provisions of the general corporation law of this state, and, in addition, a quadruplicate of the articles, indorsed by the Secretary of State with the fact and time of recording of the articles in his office, shall be filed with the Department of Agriculture within ten (10) days after the articles have been recorded in the office of the Secretary of State. After the articles have been duly filed and recorded, and a certificate of incorporation has been issued, the corporation may proceed to do business. For recording the articles and issuing a certificate of incorporation the Secretary of State shall be entitled to a fee of two dollars and fifty cents ($2.50). For recording the articles the county clerk shall be entitled to a fee specified in KRS

64.012

, which fees shall be in lieu of all other fees charged by either of such officers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 7; 1946, ch. 141, § 28; 1978, ch. 384, § 447, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 21, § 1, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Filing of articles of ordinary corporation, KRS

271B.1-200

to

271B.1-290

.

272.420.
Bylaws.

Each association incorporated under KRS

272.360

to

272.510

must, within thirty (30) days after its incorporation, adopt for its government and management a code of bylaws, not inconsistent with the powers granted by KRS

272.360

to

272.510

. Such bylaws shall be adopted by a majority of the board of directors. Each association, under its bylaws, may provide for any or all of the following matters:

The time, place, and manner of calling and conducting its meetings.

The number of members constituting a quorum.

The right of members to vote by proxy or by mail or both; and the conditions, manner, form, and effect of such votes.

The number of directors constituting a quorum.

The qualifications, compensation, and duties and term of office of directors and officers, the time of their election and the mode and manner of giving notice thereof.

Penalties for violations of the bylaws.

The amount of entrance, organization, and membership fees, if any; the manner and method of collection of the same; and the purposes for which they may be used.

The amount which each member shall be required to pay annually or from time to time, if at all, to carry on the business of the association; the charge, if any, to be paid by each member or stockholder for services rendered by the association to him and the time of payment and the manner of collection.

The method of appraisal of livestock and the manner of payment of indemnities for same.

The number and qualification of members of the association and the conditions precedent to membership; the method, time, and manner of permitting members to withdraw; the manner of assignment and transfer of the interest of members; the conditions upon which and time when membership of any member shall cease; the automatic suspension of the rights of a member when he ceases to be eligible to membership in the association; and the mode, manner, and effect of the expulsion of a member; the manner of determining the value of a member’s interest and provision for its purchase by the association upon the death or withdrawal of a member, or upon the explusion of a member or forfeiture of his membership, or, at the option of the association, the purchase at a price fixed by conclusive appraisal by the board of directors, in which case the board of directors shall equitably and conclusively appraise his property interests in the association and shall fix the amount thereof in money, which shall be paid to him within one (1) year after such expulsion or withdrawal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 8.

272.430.
Meetings.

In its bylaws, each association shall provide for one (1) or more regular meetings annually. The board of directors shall have the right to call a special meeting at any time; and ten percent (10%) of the members may file a petition stating the specific business to be brought before the association and demand a special meeting at any time. Such meeting must thereupon be called by the directors. Notice of all meetings, together with a statement of the purposes thereof, shall be mailed to each member at least ten (10) days prior to the meeting; provided, however, that the bylaws may require instead that such notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation, published at the principal place of business of the association.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 9.

272.440.
Board of directors.

The affairs of the association shall be managed by a board of not less than five (5) directors, elected by the members from their own number. The bylaws may provide that the territory in which the association has members shall be divided into districts and that the directors shall be elected according to such districts, either directly or by district delegates elected by the members in that district. In such a case the bylaws shall specify the number of directors to be elected by each district, the manner and method of reapportioning the directors and of redistricting the territory covered by the association. The bylaws may provide that primary elections shall be held in each district to elect the directors apportioned to such districts and that the result of all such primary elections may be ratified by the next regular meeting of the association or may be considered final as to the association. The bylaws may provide that one or more directors may be appointed by any public official or commission or by the other directors selected by the members or their delegates. Such directors shall represent primarily the interest of the general public in such associations. The director or directors so appointed need not be members of the association, but shall have the same powers and rights as other directors. Such directors shall not number more than one-fifth (1/5) of the entire number of directors.

An association may provide a fair remuneration for the time actually spent by its officers and directors in its service and for the service of the members of its executive committee. No director, during the term of his office, shall be a party to a contract for profit with the association differing in any way from the business relations accorded regular members of the association or others, or differing from terms generally current in that district.

The bylaws may provide for an executive committee and may allot to such committee all the functions and powers of the board of directors, subject to the general direction and control of the board.

When a vacancy on the board of directors occurs other than by expiration of term, the remaining members of the board, by a majority vote, shall fill the vacancy, unless the bylaws provide for an election of directors by district. In such a case the board of directors shall immediately call a special meeting of the members in that district to fill the vacancy.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 10.

272.450.
Officers.

The directors shall elect from their number a president and one or more vice presidents. They shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not be directors or members of the association; and they may combine the two (2) latter offices and designate the combined office as secretary-treasurer; or unite both functions and titles in one (1) person. The treasurer may be a bank or any depository, and as such shall not be considered as an officer, but as a function of the board of directors. In such case, the secretary shall perform the usual accounting duties of the treasurer, excepting that the funds shall be deposited only as and where authorized by the board of directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 11.

272.460.
Removal of officer or director.

Any member may bring charges against an officer or director by filing them in writing with the secretary of the association, together with a petition signed by five percent (5%) of the members, requesting the removal of the officer or director in question. The removal shall be voted upon at the next regular or special meeting of the association and, by a vote of a majority of the members, the association may remove the officer or director and fill the vacancy. The director or officer against whom such charges have been brought shall be informed in writing of the charges previous to the meeting and shall have an opportunity at the meeting to be heard in person or by counsel and to present witnesses; and the person or persons bringing the charges against him shall have the same opportunity.

In case the bylaws provide for election of directors by districts with primary elections in each district, then the petition of removal of a director must be signed by twenty percent (20%) of the members residing in the district from which he was elected. The board of directors must call a special meeting of the members residing in that district to consider the removal of the director; and by a vote of the majority of the members of that district, the director in question shall be removed from office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 12.

272.470.
Referendum on action of board of directors.

Upon demand of one-third (1/3) of the entire board of directors any matter that has been approved or passed by the board must be referred to the entire membership for decision at the next special or regular meeting; provided, however, that a special meeting may be called for that purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 13.

272.480.
Other corporations may become livestock protective associations — Procedure.

Any corporation or association organized under previously existing statutes may, by a majority vote of its members, be brought under the provisions of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

by limiting its membership and adopting the other restrictions as provided herein. It shall make out in duplicate a statement signed and sworn to by its directors to the effect that the corporation or association has, by a majority vote of the members, decided to accept the benefits and be bound by the provisions of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

and has authorized all changes accordingly. Articles of incorporation shall be filed as herein required except that they shall be signed by the members of the then board of directors. The filing fee shall be the same as for filing an amendment to articles of incorporation.

Where any association may be incorporated under KRS

272.360

to

272.510

, all contracts heretofore made by or on behalf of same by the promoters thereof in anticipation of such association becoming incorporated under the laws of this state, whether such contracts be made by or in the name of some corporation organized elsewhere and when same would have been valid if entered into subsequent to the passage of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

, are hereby validated as if made after the passage of those sections.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 14.

272.490.
Members not liable for debts of association.

No member shall be liable for the debts of the association to an amount exceeding the sum remaining unpaid on the member’s membership fee, including any unpaid balance on any promissory notes given in payment thereof.

Subsection (1) of this section shall not affect the liability of a member of an association for his or her own negligence, wrongful acts, or misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 15; 2010, ch. 133, § 14, effective July 15, 2010.

272.500.
Department of Agriculture to assist in organizing associations.

The state Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth of Kentucky is hereby directed to assist in the organization of any association desiring to incorporate under the provisions of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

when requested to do so in writing by any twenty (20) or more eligible persons residing within the state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 17.

272.510.
Associations not subject to insurance laws.

Associations incorporated under the provisions of KRS

272.360

to

272.510

shall be exempt from the provisions of law, now or hereafter enacted, relating to insurance companies or other organizations of a like or similar nature.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 88, § 18.